Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NEEDED HOUSING PLANNING IN UNINCORPORATED METRO
SECTION 1.  ORS 197A.015 is amended to read:
197A.015. As used in [ ORS 197.475 to 197.493 and ORS chapter 197A ] this chapter :
(1) “Allocated housing need”  means the housing need allocated to a city under ORS 184.453 (2)
as segmented by income level under ORS 184.453 (4).
(2) “Buildable lands” means lands in  urban and urbanizable areas that are suitable, available
and necessary for the  development of needed housing over a 20-year planning period, including both
vacant land and developed land likely to be redeveloped.
(3) “City” and “city with a population of 10,000 or greater” includes, regardless of size[ ,]:
(a) Any city within Tillamook County and the communities of Barview/Twin  Rocks/Watseco,
Cloverdale, Hebo, Neahkahnie, Neskowin, Netarts, Oceanside and Pacific City/Woods[ .]; and
(b) A county with respect to its jurisdiction over Metro urban unincorporated lands.
(4) “Development-ready lands” means buildable lands that are  likely to support the production
of housing during the period of their housing production target under ORS 184.455 (1) because  the
lands are:
(a) Currently  annexed and zoned to allow housing through clear and objective standards and
procedures;
(b) Readily served through adjacent public  facilities or identified for the near-term provision of
public facilities through an adopted capital improvement plan; and
(c) Not encumbered by any  applicable local, state or federal protective regulations or have ap-
propriate entitlements to prepare the land for development.
(5) “Government assisted housing” means housing  that is financed in whole or part by either a
federal or state housing agency or a housing authority as defined in ORS  456.005, or housing that
is occupied by a tenant or tenants who  benefit from rent supplements or housing vouchers provided
by either a federal or state housing agency or a local housing authority.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 1
(6) “Housing capacity” means the number of needed housing units that  can be developed on
buildable lands within the 20-year planning period based on the land’s comprehensive plan  desig-
nation and capacity for housing development and redevelopment.
(7) “Housing production strategy” means a strategy adopted by a local government  to promote
housing production under ORS 197A.100.
(8) “Manufactured dwelling,” “manufactured  dwelling park,” “manufactured home” and “mobile
home park” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 446.003.
(9) “Metro urban unincorporated lands” means lands within  the Metro urban growth
boundary that are identified by the county as:
(a) Not within a city;
(b) Zoned for urban development;
(c) Within the boundaries of a sanitary district or sanitary authority  formed under ORS
chapter 450 or a district formed for the purposes of sewage works under ORS chapter 451;
(d) Within the service boundaries of a water provider with a water  system subject to
regulation as described in ORS 448.119; and
(e) Not zoned with a designation that maintains  the land’s potential for future
urbanization.
[(9)] (10)  “Periodic review” means the process and procedures as  set forth in ORS 197.628 to
197.651.
[(10)] (11) “Prefabricated structure” means  a prefabricated structure, as defined in ORS 455.010,
that is relocatable, more than eight and one-half  feet wide and designed for use as a single-family
dwelling.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 197A.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in  this section, “Metro urbanizable lands” means lands within
the Metro urban growth boundary that is not within a city and is not  Metro urban
unincorporated land.
(2) In fulfilling a requirement to comply with this chapter,  a local government may plan
for the appropriate urbanization of Metro  urbanizable lands, by using methods including ad-
jacent urbanizable lands:
(a) In an intergovernmental agreement;
(b) In a  housing production strategy, housing coordination strategy or corrective action
plan under ORS 197A.100, 197A.365 or 197A.372; or
(c) To  accommodate needed housing identified in an analysis of housing capacity under
ORS 197A.335 or 197A.350.
(3) Except as may be explicitly delegated in an intergovernmental agreement,  counties
are solely responsible for complying with this  chapter with respect to Metro urban
unincorporated lands that are within their jurisdiction.
SECTION 4.
As part of its agency request budget, as described  in ORS 291.206, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  the Department of Land Conservation and Development
shall include one or  more requests for appropriations to the department to implement this
chapter and statewide land use planning goals related to housing and urbanization within
Metro urban unincorporated lands by providing technical and financial support to:
(1) Counties to amend their comprehensive plans, land use  regulations and procedures
and to implement land use planning; and
(2) Local governments and special districts to plan  for adequate infrastructure and to
support development-readiness for housing.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 184.451 is amended to read:
184.451. (1) There is established  within the Oregon Department of Administrative Services the
Oregon Housing Needs Analysis. The purposes of the Oregon Housing Needs  Analysis are to further
the:
(a) Production of housing to meet the need of Oregonians at all levels of affordability; and
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 2
(b) Production of housing in a way  that creates more housing choice by affirmatively furthering
fair housing, as defined in ORS 197A.100.
(2) The Oregon Housing Needs Analysis consists of three components as follows:
(a) The annual statewide housing analysis under ORS 184.453 (1);
(b) The allocated housing need under ORS 184.453 (2); and
(c) The housing production targets under ORS 184.455.
(3) Actions taken by  the department under ORS 184.451 to 184.455 are not subject to ORS
197.180 and are not land use decisions.
(4) The Department of Land Conservation and Development and the Housing and Community
Services Department:
(a) Shall assist the Oregon Department of Administrative Services with its duties under  ORS
184.451 to 184.455.
(b) May study and recommend methodological changes to the  Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services to improve the Oregon Housing Needs  Analysis’ functions and suitability for its
purposes under subsection  (1) of this section. The departments shall solicit written and oral public
testimony to inform their recommendations.
(5) As used in ORS 184.451 to 184.455, “city” [ or] and “city with a population of 10,000 or
greater” [ includes cities, as defined in ORS 197A.015, and  urban unincorporated communities in
Metro, as defined in ORS 197.015 ] have the meanings given those terms in ORS 197A.015 .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 184.453 is amended to read:
184.453. (1) On an annual basis the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall conduct
a statewide housing analysis. The analysis must  be conducted statewide and segmented into regions
as determined by the department. The analysis shall estimate factors including, but not limited to:
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected to be converted into vacation homes or second  homes during the
next 20 years.
(2) At the time the department  performs the housing analysis under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the department  shall allocate a housing need for each city. For Metro urban unincorporated
lands, as defined in ORS 197A.015, the department shall  make one allocation for each county
in Metro.
(3) In making an allocation under subsection (2) of this section, the department shall consider:
(a) The forecasted population growth under ORS 195.033 or 195.036;
(b) The forecasted regional job growth;
(c) An  equitable statewide distribution of housing for income levels described in subsection (4)
of this section;
(d) The estimates made under subsection (1) of this section;
(e) For cities within Metro, the needed housing projected under ORS 197A.348 (2); and
(f) The purpose of the Oregon Housing Needs Analysis under ORS 184.451 (1).
(4) In estimating and allocating housing need under this section, the department shall segment
need by the following income levels:
(a) Housing affordable to households making less than 30 percent of median family income;
(b) Housing affordable  to households making 30 percent or more and less than 60 percent of
median family income;
(c) Housing affordable to households making 60 percent or more and less than  80 percent of
median family income;
(d) Housing  affordable to households making 80 percent or more and less than 120 percent of
median family income; and
(e) Housing affordable to households making 120 percent or more of median family income.
OPTING IN TO AMENDED HOUSING
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 3
DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS
SECTION 7.  ORS 215.427 is amended to read:
215.427. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (10) of  this section, for land within an
urban growth boundary and applications for mineral aggregate extraction, the  governing body of a
county or its designee  shall take final action on an application for a permit, limited land use deci-
sion or zone change, including resolution of all  appeals under ORS 215.422, within 120 days after the
application is deemed complete. The governing body of a county or its designee shall  take final
action on all other  applications for a permit, limited land use decision or zone change, including
resolution of all appeals under ORS 215.422, within 150 days after the application is deemed  com-
plete, except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (10) of this section.
(2) If an application for a permit, limited land use decision or zone  change is incomplete, the
governing body or its designee shall  notify the applicant in writing of exactly what information is
missing within 30 days of receipt of the application and  allow the applicant to submit the missing
information. The application shall be  deemed complete for the purpose of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion and ORS 197A.470 upon receipt by the governing body or its designee of:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and written notice from  the applicant that no other infor-
mation will be provided; or
(c) Written notice from the applicant that none of the missing information will be provided.
(3)(a) If the application was complete when first submitted  or the applicant submits additional
information[ , as described in subsection (2)  of this section, ] within 180 days of the date the application
was first submitted [ and the county has a comprehensive plan  and land use regulations acknowledged
under ORS 197.251 ], approval or denial of the application [ shall be based ] must be based:
(A) Upon the standards and criteria that were applicable at the time the application was first
submitted[.]; or
(B) For an application relating to development of housing,  upon the request of the ap-
plicant, those standards and criteria that are operative at the time of the request.
(b) If an applicant requests review under different standards as  provided in paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection:
(A) For the purposes of this section, any applicable timelines for completeness review and
final decisions restart as if a new application were submitted on the date of the request;
(B) For the purposes of this section and ORS 197A.470 the application is  not deemed
complete until:
(i) The county determines that additional  information is not required under subsection
(2) of this section; or
(ii) The applicant makes a submission under subsection (2) of this section in response  to
a county’s request;
(C) A county may deny a request under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection if:
(i) The county has issued a public notice of the application; or
(ii) A request under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection was previously made; and
(D) The county may not require that the applicant:
(i) Pay a fee, except to cover additional costs  incurred by the county to accommodate the
request;
(ii) Submit a new application  or duplicative information, unless information resubmittal
is required because the request  affects or changes information in other locations in the ap-
plication or additional narrative is required to understand the request in context; or
(iii) Repeat redundant processes or hearings that are inapplicable to the change in
standards or criteria.
[(b) If the application is for industrial or  traded sector development of a site identified under sec-
tion 12, chapter 800, Oregon Laws 2003, and proposes an amendment to the  comprehensive plan, ap-
proval or denial of the application must be  based upon the standards and criteria that were applicable
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 4
at the time  the application was first submitted, provided the application complies with paragraph (a)
of this subsection. ]
(4) On the  181st day after first being submitted, the application is void if the applicant has been
notified of the missing information as required under subsection (2)  of this section and has not
submitted:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and written notice that no other information  will be pro-
vided; or
(c) Written notice that none of the missing information will be provided.
(5) The period set  in subsection (1) of this section or the 100-day period set in ORS 197A.470
may be extended for a specified period of time at the written request  of the applicant. The total of
all extensions, except as provided in subsection (10) of this section for  mediation, may not exceed
215 days.
(6) The period set in subsection (1) of this section applies:
(a) Only  to decisions wholly within the authority and control of the governing body of the
county; and
(b) Unless the parties have agreed to mediation as described  in subsection (10) of this section
or ORS 197.319 (2)(b).
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6)  of this section, the period set in subsection (1) of this section
and the 100-day period set in ORS 197A.470 do not apply to:
(a) A decision of the county making a change to an acknowledged comprehensive plan or a land
use regulation  that is submitted to the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and De-
velopment under ORS 197.610; or
(b) A decision of  a county involving an application for the development of residential structures
within an urban growth boundary, where the county has tentatively approved the application  and
extends these periods by no more than seven days in order to assure  the sufficiency of its final or-
der.
(8) Except when an applicant requests  an extension under subsection (5) of this section, if the
governing body of  the county or its designee does not take final action on an application for a
permit, limited land use decision or zone change within 120 days or 150 days, as applicable,  after
the application is deemed complete, the county shall refund to  the applicant either the unexpended
portion of any  application fees or deposits previously paid or 50 percent of the total amount of such
fees or deposits, whichever is greater.  The applicant is not liable for additional governmental fees
incurred subsequent to the payment of such  fees or deposits. However, the applicant is responsible
for the costs of providing sufficient  additional information to address relevant issues identified in
the consideration of the application.
(9) A county may not compel an applicant to waive the  period set in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or to waive the provisions of subsection (8) of  this section or ORS 197A.470 or 215.429 as a
condition for taking  any action on an application for a permit, limited land use decision or zone
change except when such applications are  filed concurrently and considered jointly with a plan
amendment.
(10) The periods set forth in subsections (1) and (5) of this section and ORS 197A.470 may  be
extended by up  to 90 additional days, if the applicant and the county agree that a dispute concern-
ing the application will be mediated.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 227.178 is amended to read:
227.178. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (11) of  this section, the governing body
of a city or its designee shall  take final action on an application for a permit, limited land use de-
cision or zone change, including resolution of all appeals  under ORS 227.180, within 120 days after
the application is deemed complete.
(2) If an application for a permit, limited land use decision or zone  change is incomplete, the
governing body or its designee shall  notify the applicant in writing of exactly what information is
missing within 30 days of receipt of the application and  allow the applicant to submit the missing
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 5
information. The application shall be  deemed complete for the purpose of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or ORS 197A.470 upon receipt by the governing body or its designee of:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and  written notice from the applicant that no other infor-
mation will be provided; or
(c) Written notice from the applicant that none of the missing information will be provided.
(3)(a) If  the application was complete when first submitted or the applicant submits the re-
quested additional information within 180 days of the date  the application was first submitted [ and
the city has a comprehensive plan and land use regulations acknowledged under ORS 197.251 ], ap-
proval or denial of the application [ shall] must  be based :
(A) Upon the standards and criteria that were applicable at the time the application was first
submitted[.]; or
(B) For an application relating to development  of housing, upon the request of the ap-
plicant, those standards and criteria that are operative at the time of the request.
(b) If an applicant  requests review under different standards as provided in paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection:
(A) For the purposes of this section, any applicable timelines for completeness review and
final decisions restart as if a new application were submitted on the date of the request;
(B) For the  purposes of this section and ORS 197A.470 the application is not deemed
complete until:
(i) The city determines that additional information is not required under subsection  (2)
of this section; or
(ii) The applicant makes a submission under subsection (2) of this section in response  to
a city’s request;
(C) A city may deny a request under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection if:
(i) The city has issued a public notice of the application; or
(ii) A request under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection was previously made; and
(D) The city may not require that the applicant:
(i) Pay a fee, except  to cover additional costs incurred by the city to accommodate the
request;
(ii) Submit a new application  or duplicative information, unless information resubmittal
is required because the request  affects or changes information in other locations in the ap-
plication or additional narrative is required to understand the request in context; or
(iii) Repeat redundant processes or hearings that are inapplicable to the change in
standards or criteria.
[(b) If the application is for industrial or  traded sector development of a site identified under sec-
tion 12, chapter 800, Oregon Laws 2003, and proposes an amendment to the  comprehensive plan, ap-
proval or denial of the application must be  based upon the standards and criteria that were applicable
at the time  the application was first submitted, provided the application complies with paragraph (a)
of this subsection. ]
(4) On the  181st day after first being submitted, the application is void if the applicant has been
notified of the missing information as required under subsection (2)  of this section and has not
submitted:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and written notice that no other information  will be pro-
vided; or
(c) Written notice that none of the missing information will be provided.
(5) The 120-day period set in subsection (1)  of this section or the 100-day period set in ORS
197A.470 may be extended for a specified period of time at  the written request of the applicant.
The total of all extensions, except as provided in  subsection (11) of this section for mediation, may
not exceed 245 days.
(6) The 120-day period set in subsection (1) of this section applies:
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 6
(a) Only to decisions wholly within the authority and control of the governing body of  the city;
and
(b) Unless the parties have agreed to mediation as described  in subsection (11) of this section
or ORS 197.319 (2)(b).
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, the 120-day period set in subsection (1) of  this
section and the 100-day period set in ORS 197A.470 do not apply to:
(a) A decision of the city  making a change to an acknowledged comprehensive plan or a land
use regulation that is submitted to the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and  De-
velopment under ORS 197.610; or
(b) A decision of a city involving an application for the  development of residential structures
within an urban growth boundary, where the city has tentatively approved the application and ex-
tends these periods by no more than seven days in order  to assure the sufficiency of its final order.
(8) Except when an applicant requests an extension under subsection (5)  of this section, if the
governing body of the city or its designee does not take final action  on an application for a permit,
limited land use decision or zone change within 120 days  after the application is deemed complete,
the city shall refund to the applicant,  subject to the provisions of subsection (9) of this section, ei-
ther the unexpended portion of any application  fees or deposits previously paid or 50 percent of the
total amount of such fees or deposits, whichever is greater. The  applicant is not liable for additional
governmental fees incurred subsequent to the payment  of such fees or deposits. However, the ap-
plicant is responsible for the costs of providing  sufficient additional information to address relevant
issues identified in the consideration of the application.
(9)(a) To obtain a refund under subsection (8) of this section, the applicant may either:
(A) Submit a  written request for payment, either by mail or in person, to the city or its designee;
or
(B) Include the amount claimed in a mandamus petition filed under  ORS 227.179. The court shall
award an amount owed under this section in its final order on the petition.
(b) Within seven calendar days  of receiving a request for a refund, the city or its designee shall
determine the amount of any refund owed. Payment, or notice that no payment  is due, shall be made
to the applicant within 30 calendar days of receiving the request. Any amount due and not  paid
within 30 calendar days of  receipt of the request shall be subject to interest charges at the rate of
one percent per month, or a portion thereof.
(c) If payment due  under paragraph (b) of this subsection is not paid within 120 days after the
city or its designee receives the  refund request, the applicant may file an action for recovery of the
unpaid refund. In an action brought by a person  under this paragraph, the court shall award to a
prevailing applicant, in addition to the relief provided  in this section, reasonable attorney fees and
costs at trial and on appeal. If the city or its designee prevails, the  court shall award reasonable
attorney fees and costs at trial and on appeal if the court finds the petition to be frivolous.
(10) A city may not compel an applicant to waive the 120-day period set in subsection (1) of this
section or to waive the provisions  of subsection (8) of this section or ORS 197A.470 or 227.179 as
a condition for taking any action on an application for a permit, limited land use decision or  zone
change except when such applications are filed concurrently and  considered jointly with a plan
amendment.
(11) The  periods set forth in subsections (1) and (5) of this section and ORS 197A.470 may be
extended by up to 90 additional days, if the applicant  and the city agree that a dispute concerning
the application will be mediated.
REALTOR REJECTION OF DOCUMENTS
SECTION 9.
 ORS 696.805 is amended to read:
696.805. (1) A real estate licensee who acts under a listing agreement with the seller  acts as the
seller’s agent only.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 7
(2) A seller’s agent owes the seller, other principals and  the principals’ agents involved in a real
estate transaction the following affirmative duties:
(a) To deal honestly and in good faith;
(b) To present all written offers, written notices and other written communications to and  from
the parties in a timely manner without regard to whether the  property is subject to a contract for
sale or the buyer is already a party to a contract to purchase; and
(c) To disclose material facts known by the seller’s agent and not  apparent or readily
ascertainable to a party.
(3) A seller’s  agent owes the seller involved in a real estate transaction the following affirmative
duties:
(a) To exercise reasonable care and diligence;
(b) To account in a timely manner for  money and property received from or on behalf of the
seller;
(c) To be loyal to the seller by not taking action that is adverse or detrimental to  the seller’s
interest in a transaction;
(d) To disclose  in a timely manner to the seller any conflict of interest, existing or contemplated;
(e) To  advise the seller to seek expert advice on matters related to the transaction that are
beyond the agent’s expertise;
(f) To maintain confidential information from or about the  seller except under subpoena or court
order, even after termination of the agency relationship; and
(g) Unless agreed otherwise  in writing, to make a continuous, good faith effort to find a buyer
for the property, except that a seller’s agent is not required to seek additional  offers to purchase
the property while the property is subject to a contract for sale.
(4) A seller’s agent may show properties  owned by another seller to a prospective buyer and
may list competing properties for sale without breaching any affirmative duty to the seller.
(5) Except  as provided in subsection (3)(g) of this section, an affirmative duty may not be waived.
(6) Nothing in this section implies a duty to investigate matters that are outside  the scope of
the real estate licensee’s expertise, including but not  limited to investigation of the condition of
property, the legal status of the title or the owner’s past conformance with  law, unless the licensee
or the licensee’s agent agrees in writing to investigate a matter.
[(7) In order to help  a seller avoid selecting a buyer based on the buyer’s race, color, religion, sex,
sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or familial status as prohibited by the  Fair Housing
Act (42 U.S.C. 3601 et seq.),  a seller’s agent shall reject any communication other than customary
documents in a real estate transaction, including photographs, provided by a buyer. ]
MIDDLE HOUSING PARTITIONS
SECTION 10.
 ORS 92.031 is amended to read:
92.031. (1) As used in this section, “middle housing land  division” means a partition or subdivi-
sion of a lot  or parcel on which the development of middle housing is allowed under ORS 197A.420
(2) or (3).
(2) A city or county shall approve a tentative plan for a middle housing land division if the ap-
plication includes:
(a) A proposal  for development of middle housing in compliance with the Oregon residential
specialty code and land use regulations applicable to the original lot or  parcel allowed under ORS
197A.420 (5);
(b) Separate utilities for each dwelling unit;
(c) Proposed easements necessary for each dwelling unit on the plan for:
(A) Locating, accessing, replacing and servicing all utilities;
(B) Pedestrian access from each dwelling unit to a private or public road;
(C) Any common use areas or shared building elements;
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 8
(D) Any dedicated driveways or parking; and
(E) Any dedicated common area;
(d) Exactly  one dwelling unit on each resulting lot or parcel, except for lots, parcels or tracts
used as common areas; and
(e) Evidence demonstrating how buildings or structures on a resulting lot  or parcel will comply
with applicable building  codes provisions relating to new property lines and, notwithstanding the
creation of new lots or parcels, how  structures or buildings located on the newly created lots or
parcels will comply with the Oregon residential specialty code.
(3) A city or county may add conditions to the approval of a tentative plan for a  middle housing
land division to:
(a) Prohibit the further division of the resulting lots or parcels.
(b) Require that a notation  appear on the final plat indicating that the approval was given under
this section.
(4) In reviewing an application for a middle housing land division, a city or county:
(a) Shall apply the procedures under ORS 197.360 to 197.380.
(b) May require street frontage improvements  where a resulting lot or parcel abuts the street
consistent with land use regulations implementing ORS 197A.420.
(c) May not subject an application  to approval criteria except as provided in this section, in-
cluding that a lot or parcel  require driveways, vehicle access, parking or minimum or maximum
street frontage.
(d) May not subject the application to procedures, ordinances or regulations adopted  under ORS
92.044 or 92.046 that are inconsistent with this section or ORS 197.360 to 197.380.
(e) May allow the submission  of an application for a middle housing land division at the same
time as the submission of an application for building permits for the middle housing.
(f) May  require the dedication of right of way if the original parcel did not previously provide
a dedication.
(5) The type of middle housing developed on the original parcel is not altered by  a middle
housing land division.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 197A.425 (1), a city or county is not required  to allow an accessory
dwelling unit on a lot or parcel resulting from a middle housing land division.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of  ORS 92.010 to 92.192, within the same calendar
year as an original  partition, a city or county may allow one of the resulting vacant parcels
to be further divided  into not more than three parcels through a middle housing land divi-
sion, provided that:
(a) The original partition was not a middle housing land division; and
(b) The original  parcel or parcels not divided will not be part of the resulting partition
plat for the middle housing land division.
[(7)] (8)  The tentative approval of  a middle housing land division is void if and only if a final
subdivision or partition plat is not  approved within three years of the tentative approval. Nothing
in this section or ORS 197.360 to  197.380 prohibits a city or county from requiring a final plat before
issuing building permits.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 92.325 is amended to read:
92.325. [(1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall ] A person may
not sell or lease any subdivided lands or series partitioned  lands without having complied with all
the applicable provisions of ORS 92.305 to 92.495[ .]
[(2) With respect to  a developer, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 1975, applies only to a developer who
acquires a lot,  parcel or interest in a subdivision or series partition for which a public report has been
issued after September 13,  1975, and a developer who acquires a lot or parcel in a subdivision for
which a revised public report has been issued under ORS 92.410. ]
[(3) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (g) of this subsection, ] except that:
(1) ORS 92.305 to 92.495 do not apply to the sale or leasing of:
(a) Apartments or similar space within an apartment building;
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 9
(b) Cemetery lots, parcels or units in Oregon;
(c) Subdivided  lands and series partitioned lands in Oregon that are not in unit ownership or
being developed as unit  ownerships created under ORS chapter 100, to be used for residential pur-
poses and that qualify under ORS 92.337;
(d) Property submitted to the provisions of ORS chapter 100;
(e) Subdivided lands and series partitioned lands in Oregon expressly zoned  for and limited in
use to nonresidential industrial or nonresidential commercial purposes;
(f) Lands in this state sold by lots or parcels of not less than 160 acres each;
(g) Timeshares regulated or otherwise exempt under ORS 94.803 and 94.807 to 94.945;
[(h) Subdivided and series partitioned lands in  a city or county which, at the time tentative ap-
proval of a subdivision plat and each partition map for  those lands is given under ORS 92.040 or an
ordinance adopted  under ORS 92.046, has a comprehensive plan and implementing ordinances that
have been acknowledged under ORS 197.251. The subdivider or series partitioner of  such lands shall
comply with ORS  92.425, 92.427, 92.430, 92.433, 92.460 and 92.485 in the sale or leasing of such lands;
or]
[(i)] (h)  Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks, as defined in ORS 446.003, located in
Oregon[ .];
(i) Planned community subdivision of manufactured dwellings or mobile homes created
under ORS 92.830 to 92.845;
(j) Lots or parcels created from an expedited land division under ORS 197.360; or
(k) Lots or parcels created from a middle housing land division under ORS 92.031.
(2) The subdivider or series partitioner  of subdivided and series partitioned lands in a city
or county which, at the time tentative approval of a subdivision plat and  each partition map
for those lands is given under ORS 92.040 or an ordinance adopted under  ORS 92.046, has a
comprehensive plan and  implementing ordinances that have been acknowledged under ORS
197.251 must only comply with ORS 92.425, 92.427, 92.430, 92.433, 92.460  and 92.485 in the sale
or leasing of such lands.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 92.305 is amended to read:
92.305. As used in ORS 92.305 to 92.495:
(1) “Blanket encumbrance” means a trust deed or mortgage or any other lien  or encumbrance,
mechanic’s lien or otherwise, securing or evidencing the  payment of money and affecting more than
one interest in subdivided or series partitioned land, or an agreement affecting more than  one such
lot, parcel or interest by which  the subdivider, series partitioner or developer holds such subdivision
or series partition under an option, contract to sell or trust agreement.
(2) “Commissioner” means the Real Estate Commissioner.
(3)(a) [ Except as otherwise provided in ORS 92.325 (2), ] “Developer” means a  person who pur-
chases a lot, parcel or interest in a subdivision or series partition  that does not have a single family
residential dwelling or duplex thereon  to construct a single family residential dwelling or duplex on
the lot, parcel or interest and to resell the lot,  parcel or interest and the dwelling or duplex for
eventual residential use purposes. “Developer”  also includes a person who purchases a lot, parcel
or other interest in  a subdivision or series partition that does not have a single family residential
dwelling or duplex thereon for resale to another person.
(b) “Developer” does not mean a “developer” as that term is defined in ORS 100.005.
(4)(a) “Interest” includes  a lot or parcel, and a share, undivided interest or membership which
includes the right  to occupy the land overnight, and lessee’s interest in land for more than three
years or less than three  years if the interest may be renewed under the terms of the lease for a total
period more than three years.
(b) “Interest” does  not include any interest in a condominium as that term is defined in ORS
100.005 or any security interest  under a land sales contract, trust deed or mortgage. “Interest” does
not include divisions of land created  by lien foreclosures or foreclosures of recorded contracts for
the sale of real property.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 10
(5) “Negotiate” means any activity preliminary to the execution of a binding agreement  for the
sale or lease of land in  a subdivision or series partition, including but not limited to advertising,
solicitation and promotion of the sale or lease of such land.
(6) “Lot,” “parcel” and “partition” have the meaning given those terms in ORS 92.010.
(7) “Person” includes a natural  person, a domestic or foreign corporation, a partnership, an as-
sociation, a joint stock company,  a trust and any unincorporated organization. As used in [ ORS
92.305 to 92.495 ] this subsection,  the term “trust” includes a  common law or business trust, but
does not include a private trust or a trust created or appointed under  or by virtue of any last will
and testament, or by a court.
(8) “Real property sales contract” means an agreement wherein one party agrees to lease  or to
convey title to real property to another party upon the satisfaction of specified  conditions set forth
in the contract.
(9) “Sale”  or “lease” includes every disposition or transfer of land in a subdivision or a series
partition, or an interest or  estate therein, by a subdivider or series partitioner or a developer, or
their agents, including the  offering of such property as a prize or gift when a monetary charge or
consideration for whatever purpose is required by the subdivider, series partitioner or developer  or
their agents.
(10) “Series partitioned lands” and “series partition” mean a series  of partitions of land located
within this state resulting in the creation of four or more parcels  over a period of more than one
calendar year.
(11) “Series partitioner” means any person who causes  land to be series partitioned into a series
partition, or who undertakes to develop a series partition, but does not  include a public agency or
officer authorized by law to make partitions.
(12)(a) “Subdivided lands” and  “subdivision” mean improved or unimproved land or lands di-
vided, or created into interests or sold under an agreement to be subsequently  divided or created
into interests, for  the purpose of sale or lease, whether immediate or future, into 11 or more undi-
vided interests or four or more other interests. “Subdivided  lands” and “subdivision” include but are
not limited to a subdivision of land located within this state subject to an ordinance adopted  under
ORS 92.044 and do not include series partitioned lands.
(b) “Subdivided lands” and “subdivision” do not mean property submitted to  ORS 100.005 to
100.910 or property located outside this state which has  been committed to the condominium form
of ownership in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction within which the property is located.
(13) “Subdivider” means any person who causes land to be subdivided into a subdivision,  or who
undertakes to develop a  subdivision, but does not include a public agency or officer authorized by
law to make subdivisions.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 92.425 is amended to read:
92.425. (1) No lot, parcel  or interest in a subdivision or series partition shall be sold by a sub-
divider, series partitioner or developer  by means of a land sale contract unless a collection escrow
is established within this state with a person or firm authorized  to receive escrows under the laws
of this state and all of the following are deposited in the escrow:
(a) A copy of the title report or abstract, as it relates to the property being sold.
(b) The original sales document or an executed copy thereof relating to the  purchase of real
property in the subdivision or series partition clearly setting forth  the legal description of the
property being purchased, the principal amount of the encumbrance outstanding at the date of the
sales document and the terms of the document.
(c) A commitment to give a partial release  for the lot, parcel or other interest being sold from
the terms and provisions of any blanket encumbrance as described in ORS  92.305 (1). Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the commitment shall  be in a form satisfactory
to the Real Estate Commissioner.
(d) A  commitment to give a release of any other lien or encumbrance existing against such lot,
parcel  or  other interest being sold as revealed by such title report. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (4) of this section, the commitment shall be in a  form satisfactory to the commissioner.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 11
(e) A warranty or  bargain and sale deed in good and sufficient form conveying merchantable and
marketable title to the purchaser of such lot, parcel or other interest.
(2) The subdivider, series partitioner or  developer shall submit written authorization allowing
the commissioner  to inspect all escrow deposits established pursuant to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(3) In lieu of the procedures provided  in subsection (1) of this section, the subdivider, series
partitioner or developer shall conform to such alternative  requirement or method which the com-
missioner may deem acceptable to carry into effect the intent and provisions of this section.
(4) The requirements of subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section relating  to use of a commitment
form acceptable to  the commissioner and the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not
apply to subdivided or series partitioned lands described by ORS 92.325 [ (3)(h)] (2).
NOTE: Sections 14 through 24 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were  not re-
numbered.
SINGLE-UNIT HOUSING PROPERTY TAX EXCEPTION APPROVAL
SECTION 25.  ORS 307.674 is amended to read:
307.674. (1) The city  shall approve or deny an application filed under ORS 307.667 within 180
days after receipt of the application. An application not acted upon within 180 days shall  be deemed
approved.
[(2) Final action upon an application  by the city shall be in the form of an ordinance or resolution
that shall contain the owner’s name and address, a  description of the structure that is the subject of
the application that includes either the legal description of the property or the assessor’s property ac-
count number and the specific conditions upon which the approval of the application is based. ]
[(3)] (2)(a) Following approval and on  or before the deadline set forth in ORS 307.512, the city
shall [ file with the county  assessor and ] send a notice of approval  to the owner [ at the last-known
address of the owner a copy of the ordinance or resolution approving the  application]. The [ copy shall
contain or be accompanied by a notice explaining ] notice shall explain the grounds for  possible ter-
mination of the exemption prior to  the end of the exemption period or thereafter, and the effects
of termination.
(b) In addition, on or before  the deadline set forth in ORS 307.512,  the city shall file with
the county assessor a document listing  [the same information otherwise required to be in an ordinance
or resolution under subsection (2) of this section,  as to each application deemed approved under sub-
section (1) of this section ] the owner’s name and address, a description of the  structure that is
the subject of the application that includes either the legal description of the  property or the
assessor’s property account number and the specific conditions upon  which the approval of
the application is based.
[(4)] (3) If  the application is denied, the city shall state in writing the reasons for denial and
send notice of denial to the applicant at the last-known  address of the applicant within 10 days after
the denial. The notice shall inform the applicant of the right to appeal under ORS 307.687.
[(5)] (4)(a) The city, after consultation with the county assessor,  shall establish an application
fee in an amount sufficient to cover the cost to be incurred  by the city and the assessor in admin-
istering ORS 307.651 to 307.687.
(b) The application fee shall  be paid to the city at the time the application for exemption is
filed.
(c) If the application is approved, the city shall pay the application fee to the  county assessor
for deposit in the county general fund,  after first deducting that portion of the fee attributable to
its own administrative costs in processing the application.
(d) If the application is denied, the city shall retain that portion  of the application fee attrib-
utable to its own administrative costs and shall refund the balance to the applicant.
SECTION 26.
The amendments to ORS 307.674 by section 25 of this 2024 Act apply to
applications approved on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 12
SECTION 27.  ORS 307.681 is amended to read:
307.681. (1)(a) Except as provided  in ORS 307.684, if, after an application has been approved
under ORS 307.674, the city finds that any provision of ORS 307.651 to 307.687  is not being complied
with, or any provision required by the city pursuant to ORS 307.651  to 307.687 is not being complied
with, the city shall give notice  to the owner, mailed to the owner’s last-known address, of the pro-
posed termination of the exemption.
(b) The notice shall state the reasons for the proposed termination and  shall require the owner
to appear at a specified time, not less than 20  days after mailing the notice, to show cause, if any,
why the exemption should not be terminated.
(2)(a) If the owner fails to show cause  why the exemption should not be terminated, within 10
days following such failure, the city shall [ adopt an ordinance or resolution stating its findings and
terminating the exemption. A copy of the ordinance  or resolution ] give notice to the owner stating
its findings terminating the exemption.
(b) A copy of the notice shall be filed  with the county assessor [ and a copy sent to the owner
at the owner’s last-known address within 10 days after its adoption ].
SECTION 28. The amendments to ORS 307.681 by section 27 of this 2024 Act apply to
notices to owners given under ORS 307.681 (1) on or  after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
HOUSE BILL 2001 (2023) TECHNICAL FIXES
SECTION 29.  ORS 184.455 is amended to read:
184.455. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall allocate housing production
targets to each city with a population of 10,000 or greater  and to each unincorporated urbanized
area within the Metro urban growth boundary. Housing production targets  shall describe the pro-
portion of the allocated  housing need that the department determines should be produced by for-
profit, nonprofit and public  builders in each city within six years for a city or urbanized area inside
Metro and within eight years for a city or urbanized area outside Metro.
(2) The housing production targets must be separated into:
(a) A total target; and
(b) A target segmented by each income level in ORS 184.453 (4).
(3) In establishing housing production targets under this section, the department:
(a) May  include a proportion of the allocated housing need to accommodate people experiencing
homelessness and housing underproduction within  a city greater than the proportion of the 20-year
period; and
[(b) Is not required to consider allocation of needed housing by Metro under ORS 197A.348 or
197A.350; and]
[(c)] (b)  Shall coordinate the allocation of the targets with a schedule developed by the  De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development for  requiring housing production strategies under
ORS 197A.100.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 197.320, as amended by section 16, chapter 13,  Oregon Laws 2023, and sec-
tion 11, chapter 326, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
197.320. The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall issue an order  requiring a
local government, state agency or special district to take action necessary to  bring its comprehen-
sive plan, land use regulation, limited land use decisions or  other land use decisions or actions into
compliance with the  goals, acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions, land use regulations,
housing production strategy or housing acceleration agreements if  the commission has good cause
to believe:
(1) A comprehensive plan or land use regulation adopted by a local government not on a com-
pliance schedule is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS  197.245 or 197.250 for
such compliance.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 13
(2) A plan, program, rule or  regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or special
district is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for such
compliance.
(3) A  local government is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its compliance
schedule.
(4) A state agency  is not making satisfactory progress in carrying out its coordination agree-
ment or the requirements of ORS 197.180.
(5) A local government has no comprehensive plan or land use  regulation and is not on a com-
pliance schedule directed to developing the plan or regulation.
(6) A local government has engaged in a  pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use regulation. In making its determination under this
subsection, the commission shall determine whether there is evidence in the record to  support the
decisions made. The  commission shall not judge the issue solely upon adequacy of the findings in
support of the decisions.
(7) A  local government has failed to comply with a commission order entered under ORS 197.644.
(8) A special district  has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or cooperative agreement adopted pursuant to ORS 197.020.
(9) A special district is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its obligations
under ORS chapters 195, 197 and 197A.
(10) A local government’s  approval standards, special conditions on approval of specific devel-
opment proposals or procedures for approval do not comply with ORS 197A.400 (1) or (3).
(11) A local government is not making satisfactory progress toward meeting its  obligations un-
der ORS 195.065.
(12) A local government within the jurisdiction  of a metropolitan service district has failed to
make changes to the comprehensive plan or  land use regulations to comply with the regional
framework plan of the district or has engaged  in a pattern or practice of decision-making that vio-
lates a requirement of the regional framework plan.
(13) A city with a population of 10,000 or greater , as defined in ORS 197A.015,  that:
(a) Has a pattern or practice of violating housing-related statutes or implementing policies  that
create unreasonable cost or delay to the production of housing as described in ORS 197A.400 (1);
(b) Has a pattern  or practice of creating adverse disparate impacts to state or federal protected
classes or inhibiting equitable access to housing choice, as described in ORS 197A.100 (2)(b) to (d);
(c) Has failed  to enter into a housing acceleration agreement as required under ORS 197A.130
(6); or
(d) Has materially breached a  term of a housing acceleration agreement under ORS 197A.130 (8),
including a failure to meet the timeline for performance under ORS 197A.130 (8)(a)(A).
SECTION 31.
 ORS 197.522 is amended to read:
197.522. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Needed housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 197A.015] 197A.018.
(b) “Partition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(c) “Permit” means a permit as defined in ORS 215.402 and a permit as defined in ORS  227.160.
(d) “Subdivision” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(2) A local government  shall approve an application for a permit, authorization or other ap-
proval necessary for the subdivision or partitioning of, or construction  on, any land for needed
housing that is consistent with the comprehensive plan and applicable land use regulations.
(3) If an application is inconsistent with the comprehensive plan and applicable land  use regu-
lations, the local government, prior to  making a final decision on the application, shall allow the
applicant to offer an amendment or to propose conditions of approval that would make  the applica-
tion consistent with the plan and applicable regulations.  If an applicant seeks to amend the appli-
cation or propose conditions of approval:
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 14
(a) A county may extend the time limitation under  ORS 215.427 for final action by the governing
body of a county on an application for needed housing and may  set forth a new time limitation for
final action on the consideration of future amendments or proposals.
(b) A city may  extend the time limitation under ORS 227.178 for final action by the governing
body of a city on an application for needed housing and  may set forth a new time limitation for final
action on the consideration of future amendments or proposals.
(4) A local government shall  deny an application that is inconsistent with the comprehensive
plan and applicable land use regulations and that  cannot be made consistent through amendments
to the application or the imposition of reasonable conditions of approval.
SECTION 32. ORS 197.186, 197.200, 197.475, 197.478, 197.480, 197.485, 197.488, 197.490,
197.746, 197.748, 197.752, 197.754 and 197.756 are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
197A.
SECTION 33.  ORS 197.480 is amended to read:
197.480. (1) Each city and county governing body shall provide  for mobile home or manufactured
dwelling parks as an allowed use:
(a) By zoning ordinance  and by comprehensive plan designation on buildable lands within urban
growth boundaries; and
(b) In areas planned and zoned for a residential density of six to 12 units per  acre sufficient to
accommodate the need established pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) A city or county shall establish a projection of  need for mobile home or manufactured
dwelling parks based on:
(a) Population projections;
(b) Household income levels;
(c) Housing market trends of the region; and
(d) An inventory of mobile home or  manufactured dwelling parks sited in areas planned and
zoned or generally used for commercial, industrial or high density residential development.
(3) The inventory required by subsection  (2)(d) and subsection (4) of this section shall establish
the need for areas to be planned and zoned to accommodate the potential displacement of  the in-
ventoried mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a  city or county within
Metro, shall inventory the mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks sited  in areas planned and
zoned or generally used for commercial, industrial or high density residential development.
(5)(a) A city or county may establish clear and objective criteria and standards for  the place-
ment and design of mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks.
(b) If a city  or county requires a hearing before approval of a mobile home or manufactured
dwelling park, application  of the criteria and standards adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be the sole issue to be determined at the hearing.
(c) No criteria  or standards established under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be adopted
which would preclude the development of mobile home  or manufactured dwelling parks within the
intent of ORS 197.475 to [ 197.493] 197.490.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 197A.348 is amended to read:
197A.348. (1) As used in ORS 197A.350 and this section,  “needed housing” means all housing on
land zoned for residential use or mixed residential and commercial use that  is determined to meet
the need shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent  levels that
are affordable to households within the county with a variety of  incomes, including but not limited
to households with low incomes, very  low incomes and extremely low incomes, as those terms are
defined by the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and detached single-family  housing, middle housing types as described in ORS
197A.420 and multiple family housing for both owner and renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 15
(c) Mobile home  or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to [197.493]
197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots  planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions;
(e) Agriculture workforce housing; and
(f) Single room occupancies as defined in ORS 197A.430.
(2) For the  purpose of estimating housing needs, as described in ORS 197A.350 (3)(b), Metro shall
adopt findings and perform an analysis that estimates each of the following factors:
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected  to be converted into vacation homes or second homes during the
next 20 years.
(3) Metro shall make the estimate described  in subsection (2) of this section using a shorter time
period than since the last  review under ORS 197A.350 (2)(a)(B) if Metro finds that the shorter time
period will provide more accurate and reliable  data related to housing need. The shorter time period
may not be less than three years.
(4) Metro shall use data from a wider geographic area or use a time  period longer than the time
period described in subsection (2) of this section if the analysis of a  wider geographic area or the
use of a longer time period will provide more accurate,  complete and reliable data relating to trends
affecting housing need than  an analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Metro
must clearly describe the geographic area, time frame and source of data used in an  estimate per-
formed under this subsection.
(5) Subsection (1)(a)  and (d) of this section does not apply to a city with a population of less than
2,500.
(6) Metro may take an exception under ORS 197.732 to the  definition of “needed housing” in
subsection (1) of this section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under the goals.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 197.492 is amended to read:
197.492. As used in this section and ORS 197.493:
(1) “Manufactured dwelling  park” and “mobile home park” have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 446.003.
[(1)] (2) “Recreational vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.101.
[(2)] (3) “Recreational vehicle park”:
(a) Means a place where two or more recreational  vehicles are located within 500 feet of one
another on a lot, tract or parcel of land under common ownership and having as its primary purpose:
(A) The renting of space and related facilities for a charge or fee; or
(B) The provision of space for free in connection with securing the patronage of a person.
(b) Does not mean:
(A) An area designated only for picnicking or overnight camping; or
(B) A manufactured dwelling park or mobile home park.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 197A.018 is amended to read:
197A.018. (1) As used in ORS chapter 197A,  and except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) “Needed housing” means housing by affordability level, as  described in ORS 184.453 (4), type,
characteristics and location that is  necessary to accommodate the city’s allocated housing need over
the 20-year planning period in effect when the city’s housing capacity is determined.
(b) “Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(A) Detached single-family  housing, middle housing types as described in ORS 197A.420 and
multifamily housing that is owned or rented;
(B) Government assisted housing;
(C) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to [197.493]
197.490;
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 16
(D) Manufactured homes  on individual lots planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions;
(E) Housing for agricultural workers;
(F) Housing for individuals with a variety of disabilities, related  to mobility or
communications , that require accessibility features;
(G) Housing for older persons, as defined in ORS 659A.421;
(H) Housing for college or university students, if relevant to the region; and
(I) Single room occupancies as defined in ORS 197A.430.
(2) Subsection (1)(b)(A) and (D) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(3) At the time that a city is required to inventory its buildable  lands under ORS 197A.270 (2),
197A.280 (2) or 197A.335 (1), the city shall determine its needed housing under this section.
(4) In determining  needed housing the city must demonstrate that the projected housing types,
characteristics and locations are:
(a) Attainable  for the allocated housing need by income, including consideration of publicly
supported housing;
(b) Appropriately responsive to current and projected market trends; and
(c) Responsive to the factors in ORS 197A.100 (2)(b) to (d).
SECTION 37.
 ORS 197A.210 is amended to read:
197A.210. (1) At the time that a city is required to  inventory its buildable lands under ORS
197A.270 (2), 197A.280 (2) or 197A.335 (1), the city shall inventory its development-ready lands.
(2) If the total housing production target is greater than the  housing capacity of development-
ready lands, the local government shall take any  actions in ORS 197A.100 (3) that demonstrably
prepare lands for development or redevelopment or increase the housing  capacity of existing
development-ready lands.
SECTION 38.  ORS 197A.025 is amended to read:
197A.025. (1) In adopting rules under  ORS chapter 197A and statewide planning goals relating
to housing or urbanization, or administering  the rules or statutes, the Land Conservation and De-
velopment Commission and Department of Land  Conservation and Development shall be guided by
the following principles:
(a) Housing that  is safe, accessible and affordable in the community of their choice should be
available to every Oregonian.
(b) Building enough equitable housing must be a top priority.
(c) The development and implementation of the housing production strategy should be the focal
point by which the department  collaborates with local governments to address and eliminate local
barriers to housing production.
(d) Expertise, technical assistance,  model ordinances and other tools and resources to address
housing production should be provided to local governments, using cooperative planning  tools em-
bodied in ORS 197A.103 and 197A.130, but not to the exclusion of the expedient use of  enforcement
authority, including compliance orders under ORS 197.319 to 197.335.
(e) Housing production should support fair and equitable housing outcomes,  environmental jus-
tice, climate resilience and access to opportunity.
(f) Housing production should not be undermined  by litigation, regulatory uncertainty or repet-
itive or unnecessary procedures.
(g) Local governments, to the greatest extent possible,  should take actions within their control
to facilitate the production of housing to meet housing production targets under ORS 184.455.
(2) Each public body, as defined in ORS 174.109,  shall use its authority to remove barriers to,
and to create pathways for,  the development of needed housing and shall collaborate with the de-
partment and local governments to identify and implement strategies to support  housing production
where there is insufficient housing production and choice.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 17
(3) In adopting  rules implementing ORS chapter 197A and statewide land use goals relating to
housing and urbanization, the commission may approve  a range of methodologies, policy options or
assumptions that a local government may adopt in determining:
(a) Needed housing;
(b) Housing production strategies or housing coordination strategies;
(c) Buildable lands or housing capacity;
(d) Amendments to urban  growth boundaries, including under ORS 197A.215, 197A.270 (5)(a),
197A.285, 197A.300 to 197A.325, 197A.350 (6)(a) and 197A.362; or
(e) Adoption or amendments to urban reserves or  rural reserves under ORS 197A.230 to
197A.250.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 197A.215 is amended to read:
197A.215. (1) A local government may make a land use  decision to approve an application to
remove a lot or parcel from within an urban growth boundary if:
(a) The application is submitted by the owner of the lot or parcel;
(b)(A) The lot or parcel is adjacent to the edge of the urban growth boundary; or
(B) The lot or parcel is adjacent to another lot or parcel that is removed under this section;
(c) The lot or parcel is assessed under ORS 308A.050 to 308A.128 for its value for farm use;
(d) The lot or parcel is not within the boundaries of a city; and
(e) The lot or parcel is not included  in an area identified for urban services under ORS 197.754.
(2) A local government, in  deciding whether to approve an application under subsection (1) of
this section, shall consider:
(a) The  projected costs and other consequences of extending urban services to the affected lot
or parcel;
(b) The potential value in the investment of providing urban services to the affected lot or par-
cel;
(c) Any requirement for expanding  the urban growth boundary in other areas to compensate for
any loss in buildable lands; and
(d) The projected  costs and other consequences of providing urban services to other areas
brought in under an expanded urban growth boundary.
(3)(a) Land that is removed from  within an urban growth boundary pursuant to an application
approved under this section shall be removed from any inventory of buildable lands maintained  by
the local government.
(b) A local government that approves an application under this  section shall either expand the
urban growth boundary to compensate for  any resulting reduction in available buildable lands or
increase the development capacity of the remaining  supply of buildable lands consistent with ORS
197A.270, 197A.280, 197A.285, 197A.300 to 197A.325 or 197A.350 (6).
SECTION 40.
 ORS 197A.300 is amended to read:
197A.300. As used in ORS [ 197A.285] 197A.300 to 197A.325, “serviceable” means, with  respect
to land, that:
(1) Adequate sewer, water and transportation capacity for planned urban development  is avail-
able or can be either provided or made subject to committed financing; or
(2) Committed financing can be in place  to provide adequate sewer, water and transportation
capacity for planned urban development.
SECTION 41.  ORS 197A.302 is amended to read:
197A.302. The purpose of ORS [ 197A.285] 197A.300 to 197A.325 is to direct the Land Conserva-
tion and  Development Commission to develop and adopt simplified methods for a city that is outside
Metro to evaluate or amend the urban growth boundary of the city. The commission should design
the methods to:
(1) Become, as a result  of reduced costs, complexity and time, the methods that are used by most
cities with growing populations to manage the urban growth boundaries of the cities;
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 18
(2) Encourage, to the extent practicable given market conditions, the development of  urban
areas in which individuals desire to live  and work and that are increasingly efficient in terms of
land uses and in terms of public facilities and services;
(3) Encourage the conservation of important farm  and forest lands, particularly lands that are
needed to sustain agricultural and forest products industries;
(4) Encourage cities to increase the development capacity within the urban growth  boundaries
of the cities;
(5) Encourage the provision of an adequate supply of serviceable  land that is planned for needed
urban residential and industrial development; and
(6) Assist residents in understanding the  major local government decisions that are likely to
determine the form of a city’s growth.
SECTION 42.  ORS 197A.325 is amended to read:
197A.325. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 197.626, when a city  evaluates or amends the urban growth
boundary of the city pursuant to ORS 197A.310 or  197A.312, the Land Use Board of Appeals has
jurisdiction for review of a final decision of the city.
(2) The board shall review the final decision of  the city under ORS 197A.285  and 197A.300  to
197A.325 as provided in ORS 197.805 to 197.855, except that:
(a) In circumstances  in which the Land Conservation and Development Commission has specified
by rule a number or a range of numbers that the city may use:
(A) The city is not required to adopt findings to support  the use of the number or a number
within the range of numbers; and
(B) The board’s review of the number may determine only that the city has  used a number that
is allowed by the rule.
(b) The board shall affirm an interpretation by a local government of  its comprehensive plan or
land use regulations unless that interpretation is clearly erroneous.
(3) Notwithstanding  ORS 197.628 and 197.629, when a city evaluates or amends the urban growth
boundary of the city pursuant to ORS 197A.310 or 197A.312, the city is  not required to commence
or complete periodic review. The commission shall, by rule, specify alternate means  to ensure that
the comprehensive plan and land use regulations of the city comply with  the statewide land use
planning goals and are updated over time to reflect changing conditions and needs.
SECTION 43.  ORS 197A.335 is amended to read:
197A.335. (1) At least once every six years, by  a date scheduled by the Land Conservation and
Development Commission, a city  that is within Metro and has a population of 10,000 or greater
shall[:]
[(a)] determine its needed housing under ORS 197A.018  and inventory the supply of buildable
lands within the city and determine the housing capacity of the buildable lands .[; and ]
[(b) Conduct an  analysis of the city’s existing and projected needed housing under statewide plan-
ning goals and rules related to housing by type, mix, affordability  and density range to determine the
number of units and  amount of land needed for each needed housing type under ORS 197A.018 for the
next 20 years. ]
(2) The  housing capacity determination and the needed housing analysis conducted under this
section must be adopted as part of the city’s comprehensive plan no later than  one year after com-
pletion of the needed housing analysis.
(3) If the housing capacity  and needed housing analysis conducted under this section demon-
strates a housing need, the city shall amend its comprehensive plan or  land use regulations or take
actions to update or implement its housing production strategy to include new measures  that
demonstrably increase the likelihood that development of needed housing will  occur for the type,
mix, affordability and densities sufficient to accommodate needed housing for the next 20 years.
SECTION 44.  ORS 197A.362 is amended to read:
197A.362. (1) Metro shall complete the inventory, determination  and analysis required under
ORS 197A.350 (3) not later than six years after completion of the  previous inventory, determination
and analysis.
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 19
(2)(a) Metro shall take  such action as necessary under ORS 197A.350 (6)(a) to accommodate
one-half of  a 20-year buildable land supply determined under ORS 197A.350 (3) within one year of
completing the analysis.
(b) Metro shall take all final action under ORS 197A.350 (6)(a) necessary to accommodate a
20-year buildable land supply determined under ORS 197A.350 (3)  within two years of completing the
analysis.
(c) [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro  shall take action under ORS 197A.350  (6)(b), within
one year after the  analysis required under ORS 197A.350 (3)(b) is completed, to provide sufficient
buildable land within the urban growth boundary to accommodate the estimated housing needs  for
20 years from the time the actions are completed.
(d) [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro  shall consider and adopt new measures that  the
governing body deems appropriate under ORS 197A.350 (6)(b).
(3) The commission may grant an extension  to the time limits of subsection (2) of this section
if the Director of the Department of  Land Conservation and Development determines that [ the met-
ropolitan service district ] Metro has provided good cause for failing to meet the time limits.
(4)(a) Metro shall establish a process to expand the urban growth boundary to accommodate a
need for land for a public school that cannot reasonably be accommodated  within the existing urban
growth boundary. Metro shall design the process to:
(A) Accommodate  a need that must be accommodated between periodic analyses of urban growth
boundary capacity required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(B) Provide for a final decision on a proposal to  expand the urban growth boundary within four
months after submission of a complete application by a large school district  as defined in ORS
195.110.
(b) At the request of a large school  district, Metro shall assist the district to identify school
sites required by the school facility planning process described in ORS 195.110. A need for  a public
school is a specific type of identified land need under ORS 197A.355 (3).
(5) At least three years after completing  its most recent demonstration of sufficient buildable
lands under ORS 197A.350, Metro may, on  a single occasion, revise the determination and analysis
required as part of the demonstration for the purpose of considering an  amendment to [ the] Metro’s
urban growth boundary, provided:
(a) One or more cities within  Metro have proposed a development that would require expansion
of the urban growth boundary;
(b) The city  or cities proposing the development have provided evidence to Metro that the pro-
posed development would provide additional needed housing to the needed housing included in  the
most recent determination and analysis;
(c) The location chosen for the proposed development is adjacent to the city proposing the de-
velopment; and
(d) The location chosen for the proposed development is  located within an area designated and
acknowledged as an urban reserve.
(6)(a) If Metro, after revising its most recent determination and analysis  pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section, concludes that an expansion  of its urban growth boundary is warranted, Metro
may take action to expand  its urban growth boundary in one or more locations to accommodate the
proposed development, provided the urban  growth boundary expansion does not exceed a total of
1,000 acres.
(b) If Metro expands its urban growth boundary under this subsection, Metro:
(A) Must adopt the urban growth boundary expansion not  more than four years after completing
its most recent demonstration of sufficient buildable lands under ORS 197A.350; and
(B) Is  exempt from the boundary location requirements described in the statewide land use
planning goals relating to urbanization.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 20
SECTION 45. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 46. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 20, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4063 (HB 4063-B) Page 21